Utah statutes.
26-25-2.   Restrictions on use of data.

(1)  The information described in Subsection 26-25-1(1) that is provided to the entities described in Subsection 26-25-1(2) shall:

(a)  be used and disclosed by the entities described in Subsection 26-25-1(2) in accordance with this chapter; and

(b)  is not subject to Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(2)  The Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health within the Department of Human Services, scientific and health care research organizations affiliated with institutions of higher education, the Utah Medical Association or any of its allied medical societies, peer review committees, professional review organizations, professional societies and associations, or any health facility's in-house staff committee may only use or publish the information or material received or gathered under Section 26-25-1 for the purpose of study and advancing medical research or medical education in the interest of reducing the incidence of disease, morbidity, or mortality, except that a summary of studies conducted in accordance with Section 26-25-1 may be released by those groups for general publication.

